Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,219
Notification to debtor; contents.

When the Department of Motor Vehicles receives all or a portion of a certified debt pursuant to section 77-27,218, the department shall notify the debtor of the completion of the setoff and amount received. Such notice shall include the final amount of the refund to which the debtor was entitled prior to the setoff, the amount of the certified debt, and the amount of the refund in excess of the debt, if any.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 34.